Tennessee, session 114, SB1619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-114, is amended by deleting the
language "within thirty (30) days after they are adopted" in subdivision (2) and substituting
instead the language "within fifteen (15) days after they are adopted".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1619
010343
- 1 -